New York, session 2025-2026, S2356.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 28 to read as follows: 3 § 28. Publication of reports. 1. As used in this section, the 4 following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "covered entities" means a telephone corporation with more than 6 ten thousand customers that has provided line-powered voice service at 7 any point on or after January first, two thousand twenty-one; and 8 (b) "line-powered voice service" means residential voice service that 9 is provided using copper-based facilities that are line powered. 10 2. Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, the 11 department shall direct all covered entities, to report publicly on its 12 website or websites all franchise fees paid to the municipality or muni- 13 cipalities served, all consumer complaints, and any denials of requests 14 for service from residents of such municipalities during the term of the 15 current franchise. Covered entities shall report such information with- 16 out unreasonably exposing consumers' personally identifiable information 17 in a manner that violates public service law, department practice, or 18 federal law. Such reports shall be updated quarterly. 19 3. Upon a written request for an investigation into the covered enti- 20 ty's compliance with its franchise terms and applicable state and feder- 21 al law, signed by (a) twenty-five or more customers, or (b) the chief 22 executive officer of the municipality, or (c) the county legislature of 23 the county within which the system is located, the department shall 24 conduct an investigation into such allegations contained in a complaint 25 letter. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06409-01-5